Louisiana, session 2026, SB35.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:103.4 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§103.4. Disturbing the peace; place of religious worship
A. No person shall petition, picket, demonstrate, protest, or assemble
with other persons in, or within fifty feet of, a place of worship in a manner
which intentionally and willfully disrupts, threatens to disrupt, intimidates,
harasses, or interferes with any person lawfully exercising or seeking to exercise
his right of religious freedom guaranteed by the First Amendment of the
Constitution of the United States of America or Article I, Section 8 of the
Constitution of Louisiana.
B. Whoever violates the provisions of this Section shall be fined five
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-227 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 35
hundred dollars and imprisoned for fifteen days without benefit of probation
or suspension of sentence. Each day on which a violation occurs shall constitute
a separate offense.
C. For purposes of this Section, "place of worship" means a church,
synagogue, mosque, temple, shrine, or other building used regularly to conduct
religious worship, education, or services.